Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1351.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Terms. For the purposes of this chapter, the terms defined in this section deleted text begin shalldeleted text end have the meanings deleted text begin ascribed to themdeleted text end new text begin givennew text end . Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Bicycle route. deleted text begin The termdeleted text end "Bicycle route" means a roadway or shoulder signed to encourage bicycle use. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, subdivision 68, is amended to read: Subd. 68. Roadway. "Roadway" means that portion of a highway improved, designed, or ordinarily used for vehicular travel, exclusive of the sidewalk or shoulder. During periods when the commissioner allows the use of dynamic shoulder lanes as defined in subdivision 25, roadway includes that shoulder. In the event a highway includes two or more separate roadways, deleted text begin the term "roadway" as used herein shall refer to any suchdeleted text end new text begin roadway refers to eachnew text end roadway separately but not to all deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end roadways collectively.